Illinois, session 104th, SB1202.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Immigration Enforcement Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Immigration detainer is facially sufficient" means: (i) 8the federal immigration agency's official form is incomplete 9and fails to indicate on its face that the federal immigration 10official has probable cause to believe that the person to be 11detained is a removable alien under federal immigration law 12but is supported by an affidavit, order, or other official 13documentation that indicates that the federal immigration 14agency has probable cause to believe that the person to be 15detained is a removable alien under federal immigration law 16and the federal immigration agency supplies with its detention 17request a Form I-200 Warrant for Arrest of Alien, a Form I-205 18Warrant of Removal/Deportation, a successor warrant, or other 19warrant authorized by federal law; or (ii) the federal 20immigration agency's official form is complete and indicates 21on its face that the federal immigration official has probable 22cause to believe that the person to be detained is a removable 23alien under federal immigration law.  SB1202- 2 -LRB104 03936 RLC 13960 b1    "Law enforcement agency" means any entity with statutory 2police powers and the ability to employ individuals authorized 3to make arrests, including local and State agencies.4    "Local entity" means a unit of local government, a school 5district, or a community college district.6    "State entity," means the State of Illinois and all of its 7agencies, State universities and colleges, and all corporate 8outgrowths of the State. 9    Section 10. Prohibited policies regarding immigration 10enforcement. A State entity, local entity, or law enforcement 11agency may not adopt or maintain a law, ordinance, resolution, 12rule, regulation, policy, directive, order, practice, or 13procedure, formal or informal, written or unwritten, that 14prohibits or materially restricts the State entity, local 15entity, or law enforcement agency from complying with or 16assisting in the enforcement of immigration laws. This 17includes prohibitions or restrictions on:18        (1) inquiries into the immigration status of any 19    person;20        (2) transmitting, requesting, or receiving information 21    relating to immigration status, lawful or unlawful, of any 22    person to or from any federal immigration enforcement 23    agency;24        (3) maintaining, archiving, or otherwise storing for 25    subsequent use information relating to an individual's   SB1202- 3 -LRB104 03936 RLC 13960 b1    immigration status;2        (4) exchanging information relating to immigration 3    status with another law enforcement agency, local entity, 4    State entity, or a federal immigration agency;5        (5) complying with an immigration detainer, including, 6    but not limited to, refusing to cooperate or comply with a 7    lawfully issued detainer in the absence of a warrant or 8    other order directing compliance with or enforcement of 9    such a detainer;10        (6) complying with a request from a federal 11    immigration agency to notify the agency before the release 12    of an inmate;13        (7) providing a federal immigration agency with an 14    inmate's incarceration status or release date;15        (8) assisting or cooperating with a federal 16    immigration agency, including by providing enforcement 17    assistance;18        (9) participating in any program or agreement 19    authorized under Section 287 of the federal Immigration 20    and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. 1357); or21        (10) permitting a federal immigration officer to enter 22    and conduct enforcement activities at a municipal jail, 23    county jail, or Division of Corrections or rehabilitation 24    facility involving or related to the enforcement of 25    federal immigration laws.   SB1202- 4 -LRB104 03936 RLC 13960 b1    Section 15. Mandatory duties of law enforcement agencies 2regarding immigration detainers.3    (a) A law enforcement agency that takes initial custody of 4a person subject to an immigration detainer shall:5        (1) provide notice to the court authorized to grant or 6    deny the person's release on bail or bond that the person 7    is subject to an immigration detainer;8        (2) record in the person's case file that the person 9    is subject to an immigration detainer; and10        (3) upon determining that the immigration detainer is 11    facially sufficient, comply with the requests made in the 12    immigration detainer to the extent required by law.13    (b) A law enforcement agency is not required to perform a 14duty imposed by subsection (a) with respect to a person who has 15been transferred to the custody of the agency by another law 16enforcement agency subject to the requirements of this 17section.18    (c) A court of competent jurisdiction that receives notice 19that a person is subject to an immigration detainer shall 20record this information in the court record, regardless of 21whether the notice is received before or after a judgment in 22the case. 23    Section 20. Mandatory agreements for housing persons 24subject to immigration detainers.25    (a) Each county jail, municipal jail, and the Department   SB1202- 5 -LRB104 03936 RLC 13960 b1of Corrections shall enter into an agreement with a federal 2immigration agency for temporarily housing persons who are the 3subject of immigration detainers and for the payment of the 4costs of housing and detaining those persons.5    (b) A agreement under this Section must include a contract 6with a federal immigration agency for housing or detaining 7persons subject to immigration detainers, such as basic 8ordering agreements, intergovernmental service agreements, 9agreements authorized by Section 287 of the federal 10Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. 1357), successor 11agreements, or other similar agreements authorized by federal 12law. 13    Section 25. Implementation; discrimination prohibited.14    (a) This Act shall be implemented in a manner consistent 15with federal laws and regulations governing immigration, 16protecting the civil rights of all persons, and respecting the 17privileges and immunities of United States citizens.18    (b) A State entity, local entity, or law enforcement 19agency and a person employed by or otherwise under the 20direction or control of a State entity, local entity, or law 21enforcement agency may not base the entity's, agency's, or 22person's actions under this Act on the gender, race, color, 23religion, language, national origin, or physical disability of 24a person except to the extent authorized by the United States 25Constitution, the constitution and laws of this State, or   SB1202- 6 -LRB104 03936 RLC 13960 b1other applicable federal law. 2    Section 30. Home rule. The regulation of immigration 3enforcement is an exclusive power and function of the State. A 4home rule unit may not regulate immigration enforcement. This 5Act is a denial and limitation of home rule powers and 6functions under subsection (h) of Section 6 of Article VII of 7the Illinois Constitution. 8    (5 ILCS 805/Act rep.)9    Section 35. The Illinois TRUST Act is repealed. 10    Section 40. The Illinois Identification Card Act is 11amended by changing Section 11 as follows: 12    (15 ILCS 335/11)  (from Ch. 124, par. 31)13    Sec. 11. Records. 14    (a) The Secretary may make a search of his records and 15furnish information as to whether a person has a current 16Standard Illinois Identification Card or an Illinois Person 17with a Disability Identification Card then on file, upon 18receipt of a written application therefor accompanied with the 19prescribed fee. However, the Secretary may not disclose 20medical information concerning an individual to any person, 21public agency, private agency, corporation or governmental 22body unless the individual has submitted a written request for   SB1202- 7 -LRB104 03936 RLC 13960 b1the information or unless the individual has given prior 2written consent for the release of the information to a 3specific person or entity. This exception shall not apply to: 4(1) offices and employees of the Secretary who have a need to 5know the medical information in performance of their official 6duties, or (2) orders of a court of competent jurisdiction. 7When medical information is disclosed by the Secretary in 8accordance with the provisions of this Section, no liability 9shall rest with the Office of the Secretary of State as the 10information is released for informational purposes only.11    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the 12Secretary may release personally identifying information only 13to:14        (1) officers and employees of the Secretary who have a 15    need to know that information for issuance of driver's 16    licenses, permits, or identification cards and 17    investigation of fraud or misconduct;18        (2) other governmental agencies for use in their 19    official governmental functions;20        (3) law enforcement agencies for a criminal or civil 21    investigation, except as restricted by subsections (g) and 22    (h);23        (3-5) the State Board of Elections as may be required 24    by an agreement the State Board of Elections has entered 25    into with a multi-state voter registration list 26    maintenance system; or  SB1202- 8 -LRB104 03936 RLC 13960 b1        (4) any entity that the Secretary has authorized, by 2    rule.3    (c) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, the 4Secretary may release highly restricted personal information 5only to:6        (1) officers and employees of the Secretary who have a 7    need to access the information for the issuance of 8    driver's licenses, permits, or identification cards and 9    investigation of fraud or misconduct;10        (2) law enforcement officials for a criminal or civil 11    law enforcement investigation, except as restricted by 12    subsections (g) and (h);13        (3) the State Board of Elections for the purpose of 14    providing the signature for completion of voter 15    registration; or16        (4) any other entity the Secretary has authorized by 17    rule.18    (d) Documents required to be submitted with an application 19for an identification card to prove the applicant's identity 20(name and date of birth), social security number or lack of a 21social security number, written signature, residency, and, as 22applicable, citizenship and immigration status and country of 23citizenship shall be confidential and shall not be disclosed 24except to the following persons:25        (1) the individual to whom the identification card was 26    issued, upon written request;  SB1202- 9 -LRB104 03936 RLC 13960 b1        (2) officers and employees of the Secretary of State 2    who have a need to have access to the stored images for 3    purposes of issuing and controlling driver's licenses, 4    permits, or identification cards and investigation of 5    fraud or misconduct;6        (3) law enforcement officials for a civil or criminal 7    law enforcement investigation, except as restricted by 8    subsections (g) and (h);9        (4) other entities that the Secretary may authorize by 10    rule.11    (e) The Secretary may not disclose an individual's social 12security number or any associated information obtained from 13the Social Security Administration without the written request 14or consent of the individual except: (i) to officers and 15employees of the Secretary who have a need to know the social 16security number in the performance of their official duties; 17(ii) except as restricted by subsections (g) and (h) to law 18enforcement officials for a civil or criminal law enforcement 19investigation if an officer of the law enforcement agency has 20made a written request to the Secretary specifying the law 21enforcement investigation for which the social security number 22is being sought; (iii) under a lawful court order signed by a 23judge; (iv) to the Illinois Department of Veterans' Affairs 24for the purpose of confirming veteran status to agencies in 25other states responsible for the issuance of state 26identification cards for participation in State-to-State   SB1202- 10 -LRB104 03936 RLC 13960 b1verification service; or (v) the last 4 digits to the Illinois 2State Board of Elections for purposes of voter registration 3and as may be required pursuant to an agreement for a 4multi-state voter registration list maintenance system. The 5Secretary retains the right to require additional verification 6regarding the validity of a request from law enforcement. If 7social security information is disclosed by the Secretary in 8accordance with this Section, no liability shall rest with the 9Office of the Secretary of State or any of its officers or 10employees, as the information is released for official 11purposes only. 12    (f) The Secretary of State shall not provide facial 13recognition search services or photographs obtained in the 14process of issuing an identification card to any federal, 15State, or local law enforcement agency or other governmental 16entity for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration laws. 17This subsection shall not apply to requests from federal, 18State, or local law enforcement agencies or other governmental 19entities for facial recognition search services or photographs 20obtained in the process of issuing a driver's license or 21permit when the purpose of the request relates to criminal 22activity other than violations of immigration laws. 23    (g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 24Secretary may not release highly restricted personal 25information or personally identifying information or disclose 26documents described in subsection (d) to any immigration   SB1202- 11 -LRB104 03936 RLC 13960 b1agent, as defined in Section 10 of the Illinois TRUST Act, 2unless necessary to comply with the following, to the extent 3that production of such information or documents is 4specifically required:5        (1) a lawful court order;6        (2) a judicial warrant signed by a judge appointed 7    pursuant to Article III of the Constitution of the United 8    States; or9        (3) a subpoena for individual records issued by a 10    federal or State court.11    When responding to such a court order, warrant, or 12subpoena, the Secretary shall disclose only those documents or 13information specifically requested. Within 3 business days of 14receiving such a court order, warrant, or subpoena, the 15Secretary shall send a notification to the individual about 16whom such information was requested that a court order, 17warrant, or subpoena was received and the identity of the 18entity that presented the court order, warrant, or subpoena.19    As used in this subsection, "immigration agent" means an 20agent of the U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement, the 21U.S. Customs and Border Protection, or any similar or 22successor agency. 23    (h) The Secretary shall not enter into or maintain any 24agreement regarding the sharing of any highly restricted 25personal information or personally identifying information or 26documents described in subsection (d) unless all other parties   SB1202- 12 -LRB104 03936 RLC 13960 b1to such agreement certify that the information obtained will 2not be used for civil immigration purposes or knowingly 3disseminated to any third party for any purpose related to 4civil immigration enforcement. 5(Source: P.A. 102-354, eff. 8-13-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.) 6    Section 45. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 7changing Section 6-110.3 as follows: 8    (625 ILCS 5/6-110.3)9    Sec. 6-110.3. Restrictions on use of information for 10certain purposes.11    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the 12Secretary may not release or make accessible in any manner any 13highly restricted personal information as defined in Section 141-125.9 or personally identifying information as defined in 15Section 1-159.2, provide images, photos, or facial recognition 16services as described in Section 6-110.1, or disclose 17documents as described in Section 6-110.2 to any immigration 18agent as defined in Section 10 of the Illinois TRUST Act, 19unless necessary to comply with the following, to the extent 20that production of such information or documents is 21specifically required:22        (1) a lawful court order;23        (2) a judicial warrant signed by a judge appointed 24    pursuant to Article III of the Constitution of the United   SB1202- 13 -LRB104 03936 RLC 13960 b1    States; or2        (3) a subpoena for individual records issued by a 3    federal or State court.4    When responding to such a court order, warrant, or 5subpoena, the Secretary shall disclose only those documents or 6information specifically requested. Within 3 business days of 7receiving such a court order, warrant, or subpoena, the 8Secretary shall send a notification to the individual about 9whom such information was requested that a court order, 10warrant, or subpoena was received and the identity of the 11entity that presented the court order, warrant, or subpoena.12    As used in this subsection, "immigration agent" means an 13agent of the U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement, the 14U.S. Customs and Border Protection, or any similar or 15successor agency. 16    (b) The Secretary shall not enter into or maintain any 17agreement regarding the sharing of any highly restricted 18personal information as defined in Section 1-125.9, personally 19identifying information as defined in Section 1-159.2, images 20or photos described in Section 6-110.1, or documents described 21in Section 6-110.2 unless all other parties to such agreement 22certify that the information obtained will not be used for 23civil immigration purposes or knowingly disseminated to any 24third party for any purpose related to civil immigration 25enforcement. 26(Source: P.A. 103-210, eff. 7-1-24.)   SB1202- 14 -LRB104 03936 RLC 13960 b1    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 2becoming law.